nb: Kingpin-design: Hul; Hul omvendt; Omvendt; Solid; Annet
nl: Kingpin ontwerp: Hol; Hol omgekeerd; Omgekeerd; Massief; Anders
pt-BR: Design do pino mestre: Oco; Oco invertido; Invertido; Sólido; Outro
ro-RO: Designul șurubului pivot (kingpin): Gol; Gol inversat; Inversat; Solid; Altele
zh-TW: 主銷設計: 空心; 空心反轉; 反轉; 實心; 其他
hu: Királycsap kialakítása: Üreges; Üreges fordított; Fordított; Tömör; Egyéb
vi: Thiết kế chốt trục chính: Rỗng; Rỗng đảo ngược; Đảo ngược; Đặc; Khác
sv: Kingpin-design: Ihålig; Ihålig omvänd; Omvänd; Massiv; Övrigt
ko: 킹핀 디자인: 중공형; 중공 반전형; 반전형; 솔리드; 기타
el: Σχεδιασμός πείρου: Κούφιο; Κούφιο ανεστραμμένο; Ανεστραμμένο; Συμπαγές; Άλλο
fi: Pultin muotoilu: Ontto; Ontto käännetty; Käännetty; Umpinainen; Muu
lt-LT: Kingpino konstrukcija: Tuščiaviduris; Tuščiaviduris apverstas; Apverstas; Pilnaviduris; Kita
bg-BG: Дизайн на kingpin: Кух; Кух обърнат; Обърнат; Плътен; Друго
de: Kingpin-Design: Hohl; Hohl, invertiert; Invertiert; Massiv; Sonstige
ja: キングピンデザイン: 中空; 中空インバーテッド; インバーテッド; ソリッド; その他
th: การออกแบบสลักยึด: กลวง; กลวงกลับหัว; กลับหัว; ทึบ; อื่นๆ
it: Design del perno: Cavo; Cavo invertito; Invertito; Pieno; Altro
da: Kingpin-design: Hul; Hul omvendt; Omvendt; Massiv; Andet
cs: Konstrukce kingpinu: Dutý; Dutý obrácený; Obrácený; Plný; Jiné
sl-SI: Zasnova kraljevega čepa: Votlo; Votlo, obrnjeno; Obrnjeno; Polno; Drugo
hr-HR: Dizajn kraljevskog klina: Šuplje; Šuplje obrnuto; Obrnuto; Puno; Ostalo
tr: Ana pimin tasarımı: İçi boş; İçi boş ters; Ters; İçi dolu; Diğer
es: Diseño del kingpin: Hueco; Invertido hueco; Invertido; Sólido; Otro
ru: Конструкция шкворня: Полый; Полый инвертированный; Инвертированный; Сплошной; Другое
zh-CN: 主销设计: 中空; 中空倒置; 倒置; 实心; 其他
pt-PT: Design do eixo de rotação: Oco; Oco invertido; Invertido; Sólido; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn hlavnej stredovej skrutky: Dutý; Dutý obrátený; Obrátený; Plný; Iné
fr: Type de construction de l’axe de pivot: Creux; Creux inversé; Inversé; Plein; Autre
en: Kingpin design: Hollow; Hollow inverted; Inverted; Solid; Other
pl: Konstrukcja kingpina: Wydrążony; Wydrążony odwrócony; Odwrócony; Pełny; Inny